Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 10.1. Utility Facilities Act.
§ 56-265.4:6.
Furnishing non-utility gas service.

In this section the following terms shall have the following meanings:“Affiliated interest” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 56-76 and shall be applied in this statute to non-utility gas service providers.“Commercial customer” means any person
that purchases non-utility gas service for its own consumption at one or more metering points or nonmetered points of delivery located in the Commonwealth and who if served by a natural gas utility would be classified as a nonresidential
customer under the applicable natural gas utility’s tariff.“Municipally-owned gas service” means the sale and distribution of natural gas by a municipal corporation that has the authority to provide natural gas distribution service
through the provisions of its charter.“Natural gas line” means a distribution or transmission pipeline owned and operated by the natural gas utility and subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission but excluding such lines that
serve only a single residence or retail establishment.“Natural gas utility” or “utility” means an investor-owned public service company engaged in the business of furnishing natural gas service to the public and which is regulated
as to rates and service pursuant to this title.“Non-utility gas service” means the sale and distribution of propane, propane-air mixtures, or other natural or manufactured gas to two or more customers by way of underground or aboveground
distribution lines by a person other than a natural gas utility or an affiliated interest of a natural gas utility, master meter operator, or any person operating in compliance with § 56-1.2.“Non-utility gas service provider” means
a person, other than a natural gas utility, providing non-utility gas service.“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, company, business trust, joint venture or other private legal entity.“Pipeline
safety standards” means all gas pipeline safety requirements established pursuant to § 56-257.2.“Residential customer” means any person that purchases non-utility gas service for its own consumption at one or more metering points
or nonmetered points of delivery located in the Commonwealth and who if served by a natural gas utility would be classified as a residential customer under the applicable natural gas utility’s tariff.

A person, individually or together with its affiliated interests, other than the natural gas utility that holds the certificate to provide natural gas service in a particular territory or one of its affiliated interests, shall apply to the Commission
for and obtain approval prior to providing non-utility gas service to:

Two or more residential or commercial customers located one-half mile or less from any existing underground natural gas line operated by a utility under the jurisdiction of the Commission;

More than 10 residential or two commercial customers located more than one-half mile but within one mile or less from any existing underground natural gas line operated by a utility under the jurisdiction of the Commission;

More than 20 residential or five commercial customers located more than one mile but within three miles or less from any existing underground natural gas line operated by a utility under the jurisdiction of the Commission; or

More than 50 residential or 10 commercial customers located more than three miles but no more than five miles from an existing underground natural gas line operated by a utility under the jurisdiction of the Commission.Approval of any application to provide
non-utility gas service pursuant to this section shall be granted by the Commission only after opportunity for a hearing and after due notice to the natural gas utility that holds the certificate to provide service in the
defined geographic area proposed to be served. The Commission shall approve an application to provide non-utility gas service upon finding that: (i) the natural gas utility that holds the certificate to provide natural
gas service in the defined geographic area proposed to be served is not currently offering service to the area desired for non-utility gas service and is unable to extend natural gas utility service to the requested area
within a reasonable period of time; and (ii) the provision of non-utility gas service in the defined geographic area proposed to be served, and to the estimated number of customers defined in the application, is in the
public interest.Any order approving an application to provide non-utility gas service pursuant to this section shall define the geographic area to be covered and the maximum number of customers to whom the non-utility gas
service provider can provide service before having to apply to the Commission for a revised order. The order approving an application to provide non-utility gas service shall also provide for compliance with all pipeline
safety standards; however, nothing in the order shall authorize the Commission to exercise jurisdiction over the rates, charges, or services being offered in conjunction with non-utility gas service by a non-utility gas
service provider. Further, except as provided in this section, approval of an application to provide non-utility gas service shall not infringe upon or diminish the rights of the natural gas utility that holds the certificate
to provide natural gas service in the specified area.Any fully constructed and operational non-utility gas service system as of April 8, 2009, shall be exempt from the requirements of this subsection.

A non-utility gas service provider shall comply with the provisions of subsection B if any proposed new customers (i) are located in or are adjacent to a residential subdivision, commercial or mixed-use development, currently being provided non-utility
gas service by that non-utility gas service provider and (ii) the number of such new customers, when added to the number of then existing customers of such non-utility gas service provider, individually or together with its affiliated
interests, located in the adjacent residential subdivision, commercial or mixed-use development, would exceed the threshold number of customers for any of the geographical areas described in subsection B.

In any instance in which customers proposed to be served by a non-utility gas service provider, individually or together with its affiliated interests, are in the same residential subdivision, commercial or mixed-use development, or any phase thereof,
and that residential subdivision, commercial or mixed use development, including all parts and phases thereof, straddles any of the distance thresholds set forth in subsection B, then all of the customers in all parts and phases
of such residential subdivision, commercial or mixed-use development shall be deemed to be within the distance from the underground natural gas line operated by a utility under the jurisdiction of the Commission applicable to the
customer located in such residential subdivision, commercial or mixed-use development that is located closest to such underground natural gas line operated by a utility under the jurisdiction of the Commission.

The distance threshold set forth in subsection B shall be measured in a linear manner and shall be based upon the underground natural gas lines operated by a utility under the jurisdiction of the Commission that are in existence at the time the non-utility
gas service provider applies for Commission approval pursuant to subsection B, if applicable, or at the time the non-utility gas service provider applies for the initial local government approval necessary to construct its distribution
lines required to serve the proposed new customers, whichever is earlier.

All non-utility gas service providers shall provide notice to the Commission of any and all non-utility gas service that is subject to pipeline safety standards and is being provided to two or more customers in the Commonwealth and shall provide notice
of the construction of new non-utility gas service to the Commission no later than 30 days prior to commencing construction of such system. Any non-utility gas service provider that is required to provide such notice shall be subject
to the jurisdiction of the Commission for the purpose of ensuring compliance with the pipeline safety standards and subject to any penalties that may be applicable under § 56-257.2. Upon request of the Commission, the non-utility
gas service provider shall provide, within 30 days of such request, documentation to show compliance with the requirements of the pipeline safety standards.

Any municipal corporation that provides municipally-owned gas service to residential or commercial customers located within an area where a natural gas utility holds a certificate to provide service, must have written authorization from that certificate
holder to provide such service which authorization shall not be unreasonably withheld. The written authorization shall define the geographic area to be served by the municipally-owned gas service provider. If authorization is withheld,
the natural gas utility shall provide a written justification for the decision to the municipally-owned gas service provider. Any decision to withhold authorization shall be subject to review by the Commission upon petition by
a customer seeking natural gas service. Any natural gas utility that provides written permission to a municipal corporation to provide municipally-owned gas service within a territory where it holds a certificate shall provide
a written copy of the authorization to the Commission.Notwithstanding the foregoing, a municipally-owned gas service provider shall not be required to obtain consent to i) provide natural gas service to facilities or property owned
in whole or in part by the municipal corporation, or ii) install lines that serve only a single residential customer.A municipally-owned gas service provider which fails to comply with this subsection shall be subject to relief
in a court having competent jurisdiction. Nothing herein shall authorize the Commission to impose penalties or fines on any municipal corporation.Any fully constructed and operational municipally-owned gas service system in place
as of April 8, 2009, shall be exempt from the requirements of this subsection.

The Commission is authorized to promulgate any rules consistent with and necessary to implement this section other than subsection G.

The provision of non-utility gas service without complying with subsection B shall be punishable by a penalty of up to $500 per day to be imposed and collected by the Commission, in addition to any injunctive or other non-monetary penalties provided by
law.

History.
2009, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 794, cls. 3 and 4 were codified as the last paragraph in subsection B, and the last paragraph of subsection G, respectively, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2009, c. 794, cl. 2 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of subsection F of § 56-265.4:6 of the Code of Virginia, any person that owns or operates an existing system which is subject to pipeline safety standards and is providing non-utility
gas service as of the effective date of this act [April 8, 2009], wherever located in the Commonwealth, shall notify the State Corporation Commission, by July 1, 2010, as to the location of all facilities within the Commonwealth for
the aboveground or underground storage, transmission, or distribution, otherwise than in enclosed portable containers, of propane, propane-air mixtures, or other natural or manufactured gas by way of underground distribution lines
forming a part of such system including a description of the capacity, size, construction materials and any modifications necessary to bring the facilities into compliance with pipeline safety standards for all components of such systems.”

Acts 2009, c. 794, cl. 5 provides: “That all industrial parks located within the corporate limits of a city whose 2000 population is greater than 45,000 but less than 50,000 and any facility, as that term is defined in §

15.2-6400

of the Code of Virginia, consisting of an industrial park owned or developed prior to the enactment of this legislation by a Regional Industrial Facility Authority organized and existing under §

15.2-6400

, et seq., of the Code of Virginia, the members of which are such city and a county contiguous to such city, shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection G of § 56-265.4:6 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2009, c. 794, cl. 6 provides: “That for purposes of subsection C of § 56-265.4:6 of the Code of Virginia, all customers of the non-utility gas service provider existing as of the effective date of this act [April 8, 2009] shall be included in determining
the total number of customers served.”

Effective date.

This section is effective April 8, 2009.

§ 56-265.5.
Effective date of certificates.

Certificates issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be effective from the date of issuance unless a different date be specified therein and shall remain in effect until terminated as herein provided.

History.
1950, p. 600.

§ 56-265.6.
Penalties for misrepresentations, violations of law, regulations or terms of certificates.

The Commission may, by its order duly entered after hearing, held after due notice to the holder of any such certificate and an opportunity to such holder to be heard, at which hearing it shall be proved that such holder has willfully made a misrepresentation
of a material fact in obtaining such certificate or has willfully violated or refused to observe the laws of this State touching such certificate or any of the terms of the certificate, or any of the Commission’s proper orders, rules
or regulations, impose a penalty not exceeding $1,000, which may be collected by the process of the Commission as provided by law; or the Commission may suspend, revoke, alter or amend any such certificate for any of the causes set
forth above. But no such certificate shall be revoked, altered or amended (except upon application of the holder thereof) unless the holder thereof shall wilfully fail to comply, within a reasonable time to be fixed by the Commission,
with the lawful order of the Commission or with the lawful rule or regulation of the Commission, or with the term, condition or limitation of such certificate, found by the Commission to have been violated by such holder. No such certificate
shall be suspended, revoked, altered or amended for any cause not stated in this section.

Proceedings looking to the imposition of any penalty provided for in this section may be commenced upon the complaint of any person or upon the Commission’s own initiative.

History.
1950, p. 600.

§ 56-265.7.
Appeal from order of revocations, etc.

From any order of the Commission suspending, revoking, altering or amending any certificate, the holder thereof shall have the right of appeal to the Supreme Court of Virginia, as a matter of right, as in other cases of appeals from the Commission.

History.
1950, p. 601.

§ 56-265.8.
Proceedings before Commission on or before July 1, 1950.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to or in any way affect any proceeding before the State Corporation Commission on or before July 1, 1950, and shall not confer on said Commission any jurisdiction not now vested in it with respect to any
such proceeding.

History.
1950, p. 601.

§ 56-265.8:1.
Inspection and approval of certain installations not regulated pursuant to this chapter.

The owner or operator of any facility for the generation of electrical energy not subject to regulation under the Utilities Facilities Act but designed to generate electrical energy for the use by persons other than the owner or operator shall at his
expense have the facility designed and inspected by a professional engineer licensed to work in the State of Virginia. Said engineer shall certify that the installation meets the standards of the National Electrical Code and the National
Safety Code and that there is adequate equipment for standby purposes. The provisions of this section shall apply only to generation facilities used as a primary source of power and not to emergency supply systems. The provisions hereof
shall not apply to municipally owned and operated facilities.

History.
1970, c. 363.

§ 56-265.9.
Title of chapter.

This chapter may be cited as the Utility Facilities Act.

History.
1950, p. 601.